Colorado, session 2026A, HB1390.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-2203, add (5) as
follows:
25-4-2203. Health disparities and community grant program -
rules - evaluation.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EVALUATE THE GRANT PROGRAM'S
EFFECTIVENESS EACH GRANT CYCLE, WHICH MUST BE A SEPARATE
EVALUATION FROM THE EVALUATION OF THE CANCER, CARDIOVASCULAR
DISEASE, AND CHRONIC PULMONARY DISEASE PREVENTION, EARLY
DETECTION, AND TREATMENT PROGRAM. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PREPARE
A REPORT AFTER EACH EVALUATION AND MAKE THE REPORT PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-20.5-305 as
follows:
25-20.5-305. Evaluation.
Commencing with the 2006-07 fiscal year, and Each fiscal year,
thereafter, the state board shall select a grant recipient to evaluate the
effectiveness of the program. and the health disparities and community
grant program established pursuant to part 22 of article 4 of this title 25.
Costs for the evaluation shall MUST be adequately funded from the amount
annually appropriated by the general assembly to the division from the
prevention, early detection, and treatment fund.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1390

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1390